Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.37
Subdivision real estate; instrument conveying an interest; recordable form; recording.

Any instrument conveying an interest in the subdivided real estate shall be in recordable form and the subdivider or buyer may record such instrument in the county where the real estate is located and in the office where deeds are recorded.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 37.